Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201581-3726
Tourism Conference Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Tourism Conference Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the commission. All sums of money received from fees from any conference or event held by the commission shall be deposited in the fund. The commission shall use the fund to defray expenses related to any conference or event sponsored by the commission. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2015, LB449, § 17.
August 30, 2015
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.